Florida, session 2026, SB120.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âSection 430.055, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 430.055âElderly and disabled adult contract protection.â 26 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âElderly 27 and Disabled Adult Contract Protection Act.â 28 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 29 (a)ââCognitive impairmentâ means a deficiency in cognitive 30 functioning, including a personâs short-term or long-term 31 memory; orientation as to person, place, and time; deductive or 32 abstract reasoning; judgment as it relates to safety awareness; 33 or reading comprehension. 34 (b)ââContractâ means any agreement that affects an 35 individualâs legal rights or property, including documents 36 conferring power of attorney or a deed instrument. 37 (c)ââDisabled adultâ means any person between 18 and 60 38 years of age who has one or more permanent physical or mental 39 limitations that restrict his or her ability to perform the 40 normal activities of daily living or impede his or her capacity 41 to live independently. 42 (d)ââElderlyâ means a person 60 years of age or older. 43 (e)ââPrimary languageâ means the language a person uses 44 most frequently and comfortably to communicate or the language 45 in which a person has the greatest literacy. 46 (3)âREQUIREMENTS FOR CONTRACTING WITH ELDERLY PERSONS AND 47 DISABLED ADULTS.â 48 (a)âLanguage requirements.âAll contracts involving either 49 an elderly person or a disabled adult as a party must be in such 50 personâs primary language. 51 (b)âVerification of understanding.â 52 1.âBefore an elderly person or a disabled adult signs any 53 contract that involves the transfer or waiver of rights, 54 including, but not limited to, contracts related to powers of 55 attorney, deeds, financial records, or medical records, the 56 contracting party must conduct a comprehensive review of the 57 contract. 58 2.âThe comprehensive review must include a detailed 59 explanation of all terms and implications of the contract. 60 (c)âVideo recording requirement.â 61 1.âThe contracting party shall record a video of the 62 contracting process which depicts the contracting party 63 conducting the comprehensive review of the contract with the 64 elderly person or the disabled adult and the elderly person or 65 disabled adult signing the contract to ensure that such person 66 is not under duress or undue influence during the contracting 67 process. Such video must memorialize the elderly personâs or 68 disabled adultâs understanding of and agreement to the contract. 69 2.âThe video recording must be securely stored by the 70 contracting entity for a minimum of 5 years after the signing of 71 the contract. 72 3.âThe video may be accessed only with the consent of the 73 elderly person or the disabled adult or as required by law. 74 (4)âENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES.â 75 (a)âFailure to comply with this act constitutes a violation 76 punishable by a fine not exceeding $10,000 for the first offense 77 and $25,000 for subsequent offenses. 78 (b)âIndividuals harmed by violations of this act may pursue 79 civil remedies, including, but not limited to, the rescission of 80 the contract and damages. 81 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.